lacounty-dpss-aem/ui.apps/src/main/content/jcr_root/apps/dpss/oak-index/cqPageLuceneEs/analyzers/default/filters/HunspellStem/es_ANY.dic
arriar/IRDÀÁÑ
cocer/IRDÀÄÆÐÝn
confiar/IRDÀÁÂÃÅÆÑÞñòõT
contar/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÇÐÑÒÓÝÞßàñòõù
demostrar/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÐÑÒÓ
devolver/IRÀÁÂÃÄÇÐÑÓÝÞ
encender/IRDÀÁÂÄÒÝñò
enfriar/IRDÀÐñù
enterrar/IRDÀÁÂÄÅÆÐÑñò
enviar/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÐÑÒÓÝÞßà
envolver/IRÀÁÂÄÅÆÐÝñòõù
extender/IRDÀÁÂÄÅÆÐÝñò
guiar/IRDÀÁÂÄÅÆÑñòõù
morder/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÑÒ
mostrar/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÑÒÇÝÞßàñòõù
negar/IRDÁÃÇÐñòõù
pensar/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÇÐÝø
regar/IRDÁÄÐÝ
responder/REDÀÁÅÎÒ
rogar/IRDÀÁÂÃÅÆÒß
sentar/IRDÀÄÅÆÐñòõù
soltar/IRDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÐÑÝÞñòõù
vaciar/IRDÀÁÂÅÆÒñòõ
volver/IRÀÃÄÇÑÝñòõù
